Massachusetts, session 194th, H1886.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 15 of chapter 19A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following subsection:-
(g) This section shall not apply to a person who is retained by an attorney to assist the
attorney in his or her representation of an individual client or employed by a legal service
provider to assist its attorneys in their representation of individual clients if the information that
provides reasonable cause for the person to believe that an elderly person is suffering from or has
suffered from abuse became known to the person in connection with his or her retention by the
attorney or his or her employment by the legal service provider.
of 5

SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 19C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “condition.”, in line 33, the
following:-
A “mandated reporter” shall not include a person who is retained by an attorney to assist
the attorney in his or her representation of an individual client or employed by a legal service
provider to assist its attorneys in their representation of individual clients if the person becomes
aware of a reportable condition in connection with his or her retention by the attorney or his or
her employment by a legal service provider.
SECTION 3. Section 10 of said chapter 19C, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following:-
This section shall not apply to a person who is retained by an attorney to assist the
attorney in his or her representation of an individual client or employed by a legal service
provider to assist its attorneys in their representation of individual clients if the person becomes
aware of a reportable condition in connection with his or her retention by the attorney or his or
her employment by a legal service provider or if the information that provides reasonable cause
for the person to believe that a disabled person is suffering from or has suffered from abuse
became known to the person in connection with his or her retention by the attorney or his or her
employment by a legal service provider. Notwithstanding subsection (b) of section 3, the
commission may not promulgate rules or regulations to require such a person to notify the
commission of such reportable condition or abuse.
SECTION 4. Section 72G of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following:-
of 5

This section shall not apply to a person who is retained by an attorney to assist the
attorney in his or her representation of an individual client or employed by a legal service
provider to assist its attorneys in their representation of individual clients if the information that
provides reasonable cause for the person to believe that a patient or resident has been abused,
mistreated, or neglected or has had property misappropriated became known to the person in
connection with his or her retention by the attorney or his or her employment by a legal service
provider.
SECTION 5. Section 21 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “advocate.”, in line 74, the
following:-
A “mandated reporter” shall not include a person who is retained by an attorney to assist
the attorney in his or her representation of an individual client or employed by a legal service
provider to assist its attorneys in their representation of individual clients if the facts that provide
reasonable cause for the person to believe that a child is suffering physical or emotional injury
under the circumstances described in section 51A(a) became known to the person in connection
with his or her retention by the attorney or his or her employment by a legal service provider.
SECTION 6. Section 51A of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following subsection:-
(l) This section shall not apply to a person who is retained by an attorney to assist the
attorney in his or her representation of an individual client or employed by a legal service
provider to assist its attorneys in their representation of individual clients if the information that
provides reasonable cause for the person to believe that a child is suffering or has suffered
of 5

physical or emotional injury under the circumstances described in subsection (a) became known
to the person in connection with his or her retention by the attorney or his or her employment by
a legal service provider. No board of registration created under chapter 13 may require such a
person with such knowledge to make a report of the type described in subsection (a) as a
condition of registration or impose discipline on such a person under section 61 of chapter 112
for failing to make such a report.
SECTION 7. Section 51B of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (m) and inserting in place thereof
the following:-
(m) Notwithstanding any privilege created by statute or common law relating to
confidential communications or any statute prohibiting the disclosure of information but subject
to subsection (j) and to subsection (s) of section 51A, a mandated reporter shall answer questions
and provide information posed by the department relating to an investigation conducted under
this section, whether or not that person filed the 51A report being investigated. A statutory or
common law privilege shall not preclude the admission of any such information, other than
information described in subsection (s), in any civil proceeding concerning abuse or neglect of a
child, placement or custody of a child.
SECTION 8. Said section 51B of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding at the end thereof the following subsection:-
(s) This section shall not apply to a person who is retained by an attorney to assist the
attorney in his or her representation of an individual client or employed by a legal service
provider to assist its attorneys in their representation of individual clients if the information that
of 5

provides reasonable cause for the person to believe that a child is suffering or has suffered
physical or emotional injury under the circumstances described in subsection (a) became known
to the person in connection with his or her retention by the attorney or his or her employment by
a legal service provider.
of 5